Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.020

Reimbursement not a tuition charge.

The reimbursement of a high school district for cost of educating high school pupils for a nonhigh school district, as provided for in this chapter, shall not be deemed a tuition charge as affecting the apportionment of current state school funds.

[ 1983 c 3 s 32; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.44.095. Prior: 1917 c 21 s 11; RRS s 4720. Formerly RCW 28A.44.095, 28.44.095.]